Illinois, session 104th, HB846.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Regulation of Phosphorus in Detergents Act 5is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 92/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Regulation of Phosphorus in Detergents Act.9(Source: P.A. 95-115, eff. 8-13-07.)